src/import/adjectives.lexc
@P.NomStem.First@paisuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´aisuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@paitav+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´aitav MAGUS ;
pakatav+A:pakatav MAGUS ;
pakitsev+A:pakitsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pakkuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´akkuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@palav+A:@P.NomStem.First@palav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@paluv+A:@P.NomStem.First@paluv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pandav+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´andav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@panev+A:@P.NomStem.First@panev MAGUS ;
parastav+A:parastav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@parkiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´arkiv MAGUS ;
peenutsev+A:peenutsev MAGUS ;
pehmendav+A:pehmendav MAGUS ;
peibutav+A:peibutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@peituv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´eituv MAGUS ;
peletav+A:peletav MAGUS ;
perutav+A:perutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pidav+A:@P.NomStem.First@pidav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pidev+A:@P.NomStem.First@pidev MAGUS ;
pidurdav+A:pidurdav MAGUS ;
pigistav+A:pigistav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@piiksuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´iiksuv MAGUS ;
piinatav+A:piinatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@piinav+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´iinav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@piirav+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´iirav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@piirnev+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´iirnev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@piisav+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´iisav MAGUS ;
pikenev+A:pikenev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pilav+A:@P.NomStem.First@pilav MAGUS ;
pildistatav+A:pil,distatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pilkav+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´ilkav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pillav+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´illav MAGUS ;
pimestav+A:pimestav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pinev+A:@P.NomStem.First@pinev MAGUS ;
pingutav+A:pingutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@piuksuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´iuksuv MAGUS ;
plaanitav+A:plaan,itav MAGUS ;
plahvatav+A:plahvatav MAGUS ;
poleeriv+A:pol´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pooldav+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´ooldav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@praaliv+A:@P.NomStem.First@pr´aal,iv MAGUS ;
pretendeeriv+A:pretend´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@priiskav+A:@P.NomStem.First@pr´iiskav MAGUS ;
prognoositav+A:prognoositav MAGUS ;
propageeriv+A:propag´eeriv MAGUS ;
pudenev+A:pudenev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pudev+A:@P.NomStem.First@pudev MAGUS ;
puhastav+A:puhastav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@puhev+A:@P.NomStem.First@puhev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@puhkav+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´uhkav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@puhkev+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´uhkev MAGUS ;
pulbitsev+A:pul,bitsev MAGUS ;
punerdav+A:punerdav MAGUS ;
punetav+A:punetav MAGUS ;
purustav+A:purustav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@puuduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´uuduv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@puuriv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´uuriv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@puutuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´uutuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@põdev+A:@P.NomStem.First@põdev MAGUS ;
põgenev+A:põgenev MAGUS ;
põhinev+A:põhinev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@põiklev+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´õiklev MAGUS ;
põlastav+A:põlastav MAGUS ;
põlatav+A:põlatav MAGUS ;
põletav+A:põletav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@põlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@põlev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@põlgav+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´õlgav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@põnev+A:@P.NomStem.First@põnev MAGUS ;
põristav+A:põristav MAGUS ;
põrmustav+A:põrmustav MAGUS ;
põrnitsev+A:põrnitsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@põrpiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´õrpiv MAGUS ;
põrutav+A:põrutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pädev+A:@P.NomStem.First@pädev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pälviv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´äl,viv MAGUS ;
pärandatav+A:pärandatav MAGUS ;
pärinev+A:pärinev MAGUS ;
päritav+A:päritav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pärssiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´ärssiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pöörav+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´öörav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pöörduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´öörduv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pöörlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´öörlev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pürgiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´ürgiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@püsiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@püsiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@rabav+A:@P.NomStem.First@rabav MAGUS ;
rabelev+A:rabelev MAGUS ;
ragisev+A:ragisev MAGUS ;
rahuldav+A:rahuldav MAGUS ;
rahustav+A:rahustav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@raiuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@r´aiuv MAGUS ;
rajatav+A:rajatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@rajav+A:@P.NomStem.First@rajav MAGUS ;
rakendatav+A:rakendatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@rappuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@r´appuv MAGUS ;
raskendav+A:raskendav MAGUS ;
ratsutav+A:ratsutav MAGUS ;
ravitav+A:ravitav MAGUS ;
realiseeritav+A:realiseeritav MAGUS ;
rebitav+A:rebitav MAGUS ;
reguleeritav+A:reguleeritav MAGUS ;
reguleeriv+A:regul´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@reisiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@r´eisiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@rentiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@r´en,tiv MAGUS ;
resümeeriv+A:resüm´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@riivav+A:@P.NomStem.First@r´iivav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@rikkuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@r´ikkuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@rippuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@r´ippuv MAGUS ;
riskeeriv+A:risk´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@riskiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@r´iskiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@roiutav+A:@P.NomStem.First@roiutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@roniv+A:@P.NomStem.First@roniv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@roomav+A:@P.NomStem.First@r´oomav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@rusuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@rusuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@ruttav+A:@P.NomStem.First@r´uttav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@rõhuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@rõhuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@rõkkav+A:@P.NomStem.First@r´õkkav MAGUS ;
rõõmustav+A:rõõmustav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@rändav+A:@P.NomStem.First@r´ändav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@rääkiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@r´ääkiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@ründav+A:@P.NomStem.First@r´ündav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@saabuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´aabuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@saadav+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´aadav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@saastav+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´aastav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@saav+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´aav MAGUS ;
saavutatav+A:saavutatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sadav+A:@P.NomStem.First@sadav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sagiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@sagiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@salliv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´al,liv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@salvav+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´alvav MAGUS ;
sarnanev+A:sarnanev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sebiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@sebiv MAGUS ;
seeditav+A:seeditav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@seeduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´eeduv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@segav+A:@P.NomStem.First@segav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@seilav+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´eilav MAGUS ;
seletatav+A:seletatav MAGUS ;
selgitav+A:sel,gitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@seltsiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´el,tsiv MAGUS ;
semutsev+A:semutsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@seonduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´eonduv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@seostuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´eostuv MAGUS ;
sepistatav+A:sepistatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@siduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@siduv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sigiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@sigiv MAGUS ;
sihitav+A:sihitav MAGUS ;
silitav+A:silitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sirav+A:@P.NomStem.First@sirav MAGUS ;
sisaldav+A:sisaldav MAGUS ;
sisalduv+A:sisalduv MAGUS ;
sisendav+A:sisendav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@siuglev+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´iuglev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sobiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@sobiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@solvav+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´olvav MAGUS ;
soodustav+A:soodustav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@soosiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´oosiv MAGUS ;
soovitatav+A:soovitatav MAGUS ;
soovitav+A:soovitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sooviv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´ooviv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sorav+A:@P.NomStem.First@sorav MAGUS ;
sugereeriv+A:suger´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@suhtlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´uhtlev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@suitsev+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´uitsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sujuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@sujuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sulav+A:@P.NomStem.First@sulav MAGUS ;
suletav+A:suletav MAGUS ;
sumisev+A:sumisev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sundiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´un,div MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@surev+A:@P.NomStem.First@surev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@surmav+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´urmav MAGUS ;
suunatav+A:suunatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@suunduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´uunduv MAGUS ;
suurendav+A:suurendav MAGUS ;
suurenev+A:suurenev MAGUS ;
sõlmitav+A:sõl,mitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sõltuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´õltuv MAGUS ;
sädelev+A:sädelev MAGUS ;
